Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, chapter 32, article 1, to the agency and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin HOUSING FINANCE AGENCYnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 100,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin (b) Unless otherwise specified, this appropriation is for transfer to the housing development fund for the programs specified in this section. Except as otherwise indicated, the amounts appropriated for this transfer are part of the agency's permanent budget base. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Family Homeless Prevention new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 33,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the family homeless prevention and assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, this appropriation may be used for program costs necessary to decrease the risk of homelessness and improve the effectiveness of the program, as determined by the agency. new text end new text begin (c) When a new grantee works with a current or former grantee in a given geographic area, a new grantee may work with either an advisory committee as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204, subdivision 6, or the local continuum of care and is not required to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.204, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding procurement provisions outlined in Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.06, subdivisions 1, 2, and 6, the agency may award grants to existing program grantees. new text end new text begin (e) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $10,719,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Home Ownership Assistance Fund new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 34,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the home ownership assistance program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.21, subdivision 8. The agency shall continue to strengthen its efforts to address the disparity gap in the homeownership rate between white households and indigenous American Indians and communities of color. To better understand and address the disparity gap, the agency is required to collect, on a voluntary basis, demographic information regarding race, color, national origin, and sex of applicants for agency programs intended to benefit homeowners and homebuyers. new text end new text begin (b) The base for this program in fiscal year 2028 and beyond is $885,000. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Supportive Housing new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 33,000,000 new text end new text begin (a) This appropriation is for the supportive housing program under Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.42. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.42, subdivision 4, money may be used as supplemental emergency support resources for permanent supportive housing, rapid rehousing, transitional housing, and system-related activities for the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) Continuum of Care Program grantees whose funding was awarded under the HUD fiscal year 2024 to fiscal year 2025 Notice of Funding Opportunity, whose contracts have expired or will expire, and who have experienced or will experience funding gaps as a result of HUD's nonrenewal of grants. The agency may prioritize awards to grantees based on need and type of eligible use. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding the application provisions outlined in Minnesota Statutes, section 462A.42, subdivision 5, and the procurement provisions outlined in Minnesota Statutes, section 16C.06, subdivisions 1, 2, and 6, the agency may noncompetitively award grants to existing and previous federal Continuum of Care funding recipients. new text end